Washington statutes.
RCW 41.47.040

Severability as to coverage.

If it is found by any judicial authority of competent jurisdiction that the provisions of this chapter may not become applicable to any group of officials or employees for any reason, such inapplicability shall not prevent the same from becoming applicable as herein provided to the other officials and employees embraced herein.

[ 1941 c 205 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9998-60. Formerly RCW 74.40.040.]